Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1374.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 609-A(a)(6)(i) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, is amended and the section is amended by adding a 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627 subsection to read:Section 609-A. Department of Health.--(a) The Department of Health is authorized to charge fees for the following purposes and in the following amounts:* * *(6) Vital statistics:[(i) Certified copy of a birth record...... 20.00]* * *(a.1) The Department of Health shall provide one initial certified copy of a birth record to each individual born in this Commonwealth at no cost upon application of the individual. An individual may apply to the Department of Health every four years after an initial certified copy of a birth record is issued under this subsection at no charge to the individual. The Department of Health shall charge a fee of $20 for a second and subsequent certified copy of a birth record issued during any four-year period under this subsection.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1374PN1570 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819